Rhode Island statutes. Title 40 Human Services
Chapter 8.5 Health Care for Elderly and Disabled Residents Act

40-8.5-1.
Categorically needy medical assistance coverage.

The department of human services is hereby authorized and directed to amend its Title XIX state plan to provide for categorically needy medical assistance coverage as permitted pursuant to Title XIX of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396 et seq., as amended, to individuals who are sixty-five (65) years or older or are disabled, as determined under § 1614(a)(3) of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1382c(a)(3), as amended, whose income does not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the federal poverty level (as revised annually) applicable to the individual’s family size, and whose resources do not exceed four thousand dollars ($4,000) per individual, or six thousand dollars ($6,000) per couple. The department shall provide medical assistance coverage to such elderly or disabled persons in the same amount, duration, and scope as provided to other categorically needy persons under the state’s Title XIX state plan.

History of Section.

P.L. 2000, ch. 104, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 351, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 394, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 263, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 286, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 424, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 17, § 5; P.L. 2009, ch. 310, § 16.

40-8.5-1.1.
Managed healthcare delivery systems.

To ensure that all medical assistance beneficiaries, including the elderly and all individuals with disabilities, have access to quality and affordable health care, the executive office of health and human services (“executive office”) is authorized to implement mandatory managed-care health systems.

“Managed care” is defined as systems that: integrate an efficient financing mechanism with quality service delivery; provide a “medical home” to ensure appropriate care and deter unnecessary services; and place emphasis on preventive and primary care. For purposes of this section, managed care systems may also be defined to include a primary care case-management model, community health teams, and/or other such arrangements that meet standards established by the executive office and serve the purposes of this section. Managed care systems may also include services and supports that optimize the health and independence of beneficiaries who are determined to need Medicaid-funded long-term care under chapter 8.10 of this title or to be at risk for the care under applicable federal state plan or waiver authorities and the rules and regulations promulgated by the executive office. Any Medicaid beneficiaries who have third-party medical coverage or insurance may be provided such services through an entity certified by, or in a contractual arrangement with, the executive office or, as deemed appropriate, exempt from mandatory managed care in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the executive office.

In accordance with §

42-12.4-7

, the executive office is authorized to obtain any approval through waiver(s), category II or III changes, and/or state-plan amendments, from the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, that are necessary to implement mandatory, managed healthcare delivery systems for all Medicaid beneficiaries. The waiver(s), category II or III changes, and/or state-plan amendments shall include the authorization to extend managed care to cover long-term-care services and supports. Authorization shall also include, as deemed appropriate, exempting certain beneficiaries with third-party medical coverage or insurance from mandatory managed care in accordance with rules and regulations promulgated by the executive office.

To ensure the delivery of timely and appropriate services to persons who become eligible for Medicaid by virtue of their eligibility for a United States Social Security Administration program, the executive office is authorized to seek any and all data-sharing agreements or other agreements with the Social Security Administration as may be necessary to receive timely and accurate diagnostic data and clinical assessments. This information shall be used exclusively for the purpose of service planning, and shall be held and exchanged in accordance with all applicable state and federal medical record confidentiality laws and regulations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2008, ch. 100, art. 17, § 6; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 22, § 3; P.L. 2009, ch. 69, § 3; P.L. 2010, ch. 23, art. 20, § 3; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 7, § 4.

40-8.5-2.
Crisis intervention services for adult victims with severe impairments of abuse, neglect and/or exploitation.

As used in this section the terms:

“Adult victim with severe impairments” means:

A person over the age of eighteen (18) who has a disability attributable to a mental or physical impairment, or combination of mental and physical impairments, and results in substantial functional limitations in three (3) or more major life activities;

Is an alleged victim of abuse, neglect, or exploitation pursuant to §

11-5-12

; or assault pursuant to §

11-5-10.2

or

11-5-11

by a caregiver of the victim;

The adult victim relies on the person believed to have committed the abuse, neglect, and/or exploitation, for assistance in performing three (3) or more major life activities; and

Crisis intervention services are necessary to ensure the immediate health and safety of the adult victim.

“Crisis intervention services” means the short term provision of health care and residential services in the immediate hours and days following the abuse, neglect, and/or exploitation of an adult victim with severe impairments;

“Major life activities” mean: (i) Mobility; (ii) Self-care; (iii) Communication; (iv) Receptive and/or expressive language; (v) Learning; (vi) Self-direction; (vii) Capacity for independent living; or (viii) Economic self-sufficiency;

“Secretary” means the secretary of the executive office of health and human services; and

“Supportive services” means longer-term support services for an adult victim with severe impairments, and when appropriate, that victim’s family.

After July 1, 2007, local police departments may request the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals provide crisis intervention services for the adult victim with severe impairments when:

Necessary to ensure the immediate health and safety of the adult victim; and

The adult victim with severe impairments relies on the person believed to have committed the abuse, neglect, and/or exploitation for assistance in performing three (3) or more major life activities;

After the victim is informed of his or her right to refuse crisis intervention and/or supportive services.

If the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals determines that longer-term supportive services are necessary, the victim, and when appropriate that victim’s family, will be referred to the public and private agencies and departments whose supportive services are within its statutory and/or regulatory responsibility, as are needed by the victim.

In developing the supportive services care plan, the adult victim with severe impairments’ rights to self-determination and lifestyle preferences commensurate with his or her needs shall be of prime consideration.

If the adult victim with severe impairments withdraws consent or refuses to accept crisis intervention or supportive services, the services shall not be provided.

The department of human services is hereby authorized to seek federal approval of a state plan amendment to its Title XIX state plan to initiate crisis intervention services and support services for adults who qualify for Title XIX services and are adult victims with severe impairments of abuse, assault, neglect, or exploitation.

The secretary shall recognize the statewide toll-free, twenty-four-hour-a-day (24), seven-day (7) quality-assurance hotline operated by the department of behavioral healthcare, developmental disabilities and hospitals, and authorized pursuant to §

40.1-26-10

, for the use of the general public to report abuse, neglect, and exploitation and/or request crisis intervention and/or supportive services for adult victims with severe impairments.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 175, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 268, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 254, § 3; P.L. 2012, ch. 264, § 3.